Montana, session 2025, HB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 16-4-1006, MCA, is amended to read:
"16-4-1006. Responsible server and sales training program. (1) The Subject to subsection (2), the
department shall certify all server and sales training programs that include the following:
(a) effects of alcohol on the human body;
(b) information, including criminal, civil, and administrative penalties, related to 27-1-710 and this
code;
(c) procedures for checking identification;
(d) procedures for gathering proper documentation that may affect the licensee's liability;
(e) training for skills to handle difficult situations and to learn evaluation techniques regarding
intoxicated persons or others that pose potential liability;
(f) a final test; and
(g) a certificate of completion, which must be provided to participants who pass the final test.
(2) The department shall certify two classes of training programs based on the nature of
employment of the individual as follows:
(a) programs for employees of licensed locations that provide for on-premises consumption; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 157
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0157
(b) programs for employees of licensees that only provide for off-premises consumption. A training
program under this subsection (2)(b) must be completed within at least half of the time for programs under
subsection (2)(a).
(2)(3) The department may not provide a responsible server and sales training program."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 157
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 157, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 157
INTRODUCED BY K. KORTUM, E. BUTTREY
AN ACT REVISING ALCOHOL LAWS RELATING TO THE RESPONSIBLE SERVER AND SALES TRAINING
PROGRAM; REQUIRING TWO TRAINING PROGRAMS RELATED TO WHETHER THE SERVER IS
EMPLOYED AT A LICENSED LOCATION WHERE ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOL IS
ALLOWED; REQUIRING THAT A PROGRAM FOR EMPLOYEES OF LICENSEES ONLY PROVIDING OFF-
PREMISES CONSUMPTION MUST TAKE LESS TIME; AND AMENDING SECTION 16-4-1006, MCA; AND
PROVIDING A DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE.”